Utah statutes.
31A-5-602.   Doing business in other states.
(1)  Subject to Subsection (2), no domestic insurer may do an insurance
business in any state in which it does not have a certificate of authority.
It may not knowingly solicit in those states in any manner.  Advertisements
through printed media, radio, or television do not violate this subsection if
they originate outside the state where there is no authority to do business,
are not specifically directed to citizens of that state, and have a majority
of their audience in states in which the insurer does have a certificate of
authority.
(2)  A domestic insurer may do a surplus lines business in a state in which it
is not authorized, only if it complies with the surplus lines law of that
state.
